Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-226
Billiard halls; bowling alleys; disorderly houses; gambling; regulation.

A city of the first class by ordinance may regulate, prohibit, and suppress unlicensed billiard tables and bowling alleys, may restrain houses of prostitution, opium joints, dens, and other disorderly houses and practices, games, and gambling houses, may regulate all public amusements, shows, or exhibitions, and may prohibit all lotteries, all fraudulent devices and practices for the purpose of obtaining money or property, all shooting galleries except as provided in the Nebraska Shooting Range Protection Act, and all kinds of public indecencies, except that nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to bingo, lotteries, lotteries by the sale of pickle cards, or raffles conducted in accordance with the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, or the State Lottery Act.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXXIII, p. 254;

R.S.1913, § 4842;

C.S.1922, § 4010;

C.S.1929, § 16-227;

R.S.1943, § 16-226;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 188;

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 61;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 63;

Laws 2009, LB503, § 13;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 30.
July 21, 2016
Nebraska Bingo Act, see section 9-201.

Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-401.

Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, see section 9-301.

Nebraska Shooting Range Protection Act, see section 37-1301.

Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-501.

State Lottery Act, see section 9-801.

Under the terms of a prior act, the Legislature authorized cities to prohibit, or to license, the keeping of billiard and pool tables for hire, and to provide a fine for the violation thereof. In re Langston, 55 Neb. 310, 75 N.W. 828 (1898).